Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.520

Receivership—Foreclosures and seizures not allowed.

No seizure, foreclosure, or interference with nursing home revenues, supplies, real property, improvements, or equipment may be allowed for the duration of the receivership without prior court approval.

[ 1987 c 476 s 21.]